Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-201.5 Conformity to federal law.
(a) The provisions of title 42 United States Code section 300gg, et seq., as
they relate to group and individual health insurance shall apply to title 24,
except:

(1) Where state law provides greater health benefits
or coverage than title 42 United States Code section 300gg, et seq., state law
shall be applicable; and

(2) This section shall not apply to or affect life
insurance, endowment, or annuity contracts, or any supplemental contract
thereto, described in section 431:10A-101(4).

(b) The following definitions shall be used
when applying title 42 United States Code section 300gg, et seq.:

"Employee" means an employee who
works on a full-time basis with a normal workweek of twenty hours or more.

"Group health issuer" means all
persons offering health insurance coverage to any group or association, but
shall not include those persons offering benefits exempted from title I of the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, under
sections 732(c) and 733(c) of title I of the Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974 and sections 2747 and 2791(c) of the Public Health Service
Act.

"Small employer" means, in connection
with a group health plan with respect to a calendar year and a plan year, an
employer who employed an average of at least one but no more than fifty
employees on business days during the preceding calendar year and who employs
at least one employee on the first day of the plan year.

(c) All group health issuers shall offer all
small group health plans to all small employers whose employees live, work, or
reside in the group health issuer's service areas; provided that the commissioner
may exempt a group health issuer if the commissioner determines that the group
health issuer does not have the capacity to deliver services adequately to
enrollees of additional groups given its obligation to existing employer
groups; and provided further that the commissioner shall exempt from this
subsection group health plans offered to small employers that employ only one
employee, if the group health issuer offers the small employer groups at least
one small group health plan that meets the requirements of chapter 393, and
upon the determination by the commissioner that the group health issuer has the
capacity to adequately deliver services to enrollees of the additional groups,
subject to its obligations to existing employer groups.

(d) A group health issuer shall be prohibited
from imposing any preexisting condition exclusion.

(e) The commissioner may adopt rules to
implement, clarify, or conform title 24 to title 42 United States Code section
300gg, et seq.

(f) The adoption of the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, for the purposes of
title 24 is not an adoption for any purposes for income taxes under chapter
235.

(g) The State shall have jurisdiction over any
matter that title 42 United States Code section 300gg, et seq., permits,
including jurisdiction over enforcement.

(h) As used in this section, "small group
health plans" means the medical plans currently offered, advertised, or
marketed by a group health issuer for small employers. [L 1997, c 291, §2; am L
1999, c 93, §5; am L 2000, c 151, §1; am L 2001, c 55, §19; am L 2004, c 122,
§2; am L 2007, c 247, §1; am L 2008, c 120, §§1, 3; am L 2009, c 11, §14; am L
2013, c 192, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next